Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-612] Diabetes coverage. All
group health care contracts under this chapter shall provide, to the extent
provided under section 431:10A-121, coverage for outpatient diabetes
self-management training, education, equipment, and supplies. [L 2000, c 243,
§3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next